Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-6918
Rules and regulations.

The director may adopt and promulgate rules and regulations to carry out sections 44-6901 to 44-6918.

Laws 1997, LB 862, § 18;

Laws 2000, LB 1253, § 42;

Laws 2002, LB 1139, § 48.